Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-315
Change of name or address; election commissioner or county clerk; duties.

Upon receiving a completed voter registration application pursuant to section 32-308 or 32-310 indicating that a voter who is registered in the county has changed his or her name or moved to another residence within the same county, the election commissioner or county clerk shall change the voter registration record of the registered voter to the new name or new address and shall send an acknowledgment card to the registered voter indicating that the change of registration has been completed and the address of the voter's new polling place.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 77;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 36;

Laws 1999, LB 234, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 18;

Laws 2014, LB661, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 29.